Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-304
State plan; submit to Legislature.

Upon submitting a state plan to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall electronically submit to the Legislature a copy of the state plan.

Laws 2015, LB469, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 74;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 359.